lt-LT: Mastelinio sunkvežimio era: 1940-ieji; 1950-ieji; 1960-ieji; 1970-ieji; 1980-ieji; 1990-ieji; 2000-ieji; 2010-ieji; 2020-ieji; Šiuolaikinis (nenurodyta); Iki 1940 m.; Senovinis (nenurodyta); Kita
hr-HR: Era maketa kamiona: 1940-e; 1950-e; 1960-e; 1970-e; 1980-e; 1990-e; 2000-e; 2010-e; 2020-e; Suvremeno (neodređeno); Prije 1940.; Starinsko (neodređeno); Ostalo
tr: Ölçekli model kamyon dönemi: 1940'lar; 1950'ler; 1960'lar; 1970'ler; 1980'ler; 1990'lar; 2000'ler; 2010'lar; 2020'ler; Modern (belirtilmemiş); 1940 öncesi; Klasik (belirtilmemiş); Diğer
sv: Skalmodell av lastbil – tidsperiod: 1940-tal; 1950-tal; 1960-tal; 1970-tal; 1980-tal; 1990-tal; 2000-tal; 2010-tal; 2020-tal; Nutida (ospecificerat); Före 1940; Vintage (ospecificerat); Övrigt
ja: スケールモデルトラックの年代: 1940年代; 1950年代; 1960年代; 1970年代; 1980年代; 1990年代; 2000年代; 2010年代; 2020年代; 現代 (指定なし); 1940年以前; ビンテージ (指定なし); その他
de: Epoche de: 1940er; 1950er; 1960er; 1970er; 1980er; 1990er; 2000er; 2010er; 2020er; Zeitgenössisch (unspezifiziert); Vor 1940; Vintage (unspezifiziert); Sonstige
el: Εποχή μοντέλου φορτηγού κλίμακας: Δεκαετία του 1940; Δεκαετία του 1950; Δεκαετία του 1960; Δεκαετία του 1970; Δεκαετία του 1980; Δεκαετία του 1990; Δεκαετία του 2000; Δεκαετία του 2010; Δεκαετία του 2020; Σύγχρονο (μη καθορισμένο); Πριν το 1940; Vintage (μη καθορισμένο); Άλλο
pl: Epoka modelu ciężarówki w skali: Lata 40.; Lata 50.; Lata 60.; Lata 70.; Lata 80.; Lata 90.; Lata 2000.; Lata 2010.; Lata 2020.; Współczesne (nieokreślone); Przed 1940 r.; Zabytkowe (nieokreślone); Inne
vi: Kỷ nguyên xe tải mô hình: Thập niên 1940; Thập niên 1950; Thập niên 1960; Thập niên 1970; Thập niên 1980; Thập niên 1990; Thập niên 2000; Thập niên 2010; Thập niên 2020; Hiện đại (không xác định); Trước 1940; Cổ điển (không xác định); Khác
it: Periodo del camion in scala: Anni ’40; Anni ’50; Anni ’60; Anni ’70; Anni ’80; Anni ’90; Anni 2000; Anni 2010; Anni 2020; Contemporaneo (non specificato); Ante 1940; Vintage (non specificato); Altro
ru: Эпоха грузовика в масштабной модели: 1940-е гг.; 1950-е гг.; 1960-е гг.; 1970-е гг.; 1980-е гг.; 1990-е гг.; 2000-е гг.; 2010-е гг.; 2020-е гг.; Современность (без указания точного периода); До 1940 года; Винтаж (без указания точного периода); Другое
pt-BR: Modelo em escala de caminhão época: Anos 1940; Anos 1950; Anos 1960; Anos 1970; Anos 1980; Anos 1990; Anos 2000; Anos 2010; Anos 2020; Contemporâneo (não especificado); Anterior a 1940; Clássico (não especificado); Outros
bg-BG: Епоха на умален модел камион: 1940-те; 1950-те; 1960-те; 1970-те; 1980-те; 1990-те; 2000-те; 2010-те; 2020-те; Съвременни (неуточнено); Преди 1940 г.; Ретро (неуточнено); Други
fi: Kuorma-auton pienoismallin aikakausi: 1940-luku; 1950-luku; 1960-luku; 1970-luku; 1980-luku; 1990-luku; 2000-luku; 2010-luku; 2020-luku; Nykyaikainen (ei määritetty); Ennen vuotta 1940; Vintage (ei määritetty); Muu
en: Scale model truck era: 1940s; 1950s; 1960s; 1970s; 1980s; 1990s; 2000s; 2010s; 2020s; Contemporary (unspecified); Pre-1940; Vintage (unspecified); Other
zh-CN: 比例模型卡车年代: 20 世纪 40 年代; 20 世纪 50 年代; 20 世纪 60 年代; 20 世纪 70 年代; 20 世纪 80 年代; 20 世纪 90 年代; 21 世纪 00 年代; 21 世纪 10 年代; 2020 年代; 当代（未指定）; 1940 年以前; 经典（未指定）; 其他
nl: Schaalmodel vrachtwagen tijdperk: Jaren 40; Jaren 50; Jaren 60; Jaren 70; Jaren 80; Jaren 90; Jaren 00; Jaren 10; Jaren 20; Eigentijds (ongespecificeerd); Voor 1940; Vintage (ongespecificeerd); Overig
sk-SK: Éra modelových nákladných vozidiel: 40. roky 20. storočia; 50. roky 20. storočia; 60. roky 20. storočia; 70. roky 20. storočia; 80. roky 20. storočia; 90. roky 20. storočia; Roky 2000 – 2009; Roky 2010 – 2019; 20. roky 21. storočia; Súčasné (nešpecifikované); Pred rokom 1940; Klasické (nešpecifikované); Iné
nb: Skalamodell for lastebilæra: 1940-tallet; 1950-tallet; 1960-tallet; 1970-tallet; 1980-tallet; 1990-tallet; 2000-tallet; 2010-tallet; 2020-tallet; Moderne (uspesifisert); Før 1940; Vintage (uspesifisert); Annet
cs: Éra modelu nákladního vozu v měřítku: 40. léta 20. století; 50. léta 20. století; 60. léta 20. století; 70. léta 20. století; 80. léta 20. století; 90. léta 20. století; Nultá léta 21. století; 10. léta 21. století; 20. léta 21. století; Současné (nespecifikované); Před rokem 1940; Vintage (nespecifikované); Jiné
zh-TW: 比例模型卡車年代: 1940 年代; 1950 年代; 1960 年代; 1970 年代; 1980 年代; 1990 年代; 2000 年代; 2010 年代; 2020 年代; 現代 (未指定); 1940 年以前; 復古 (未指定); 其他
sl-SI: Obdobje makete tovornjaka: 1940-a; 1950-a; 1960-a; 1970-a; 1980-a; 1990-a; 2000-a; 2010-a; 2020-a; Sodobno (nedoločeno); Pred 1940; Vintage (nedoločeno); Drugo
th: ยุคของโมเดลรถบรรทุก: ทศวรรษที่ 1940; ทศวรรษที่ 1950; ทศวรรษที่ 1960; ทศวรรษที่ 1970; ทศวรรษที่ 1980; ทศวรรษที่ 1990; ทศวรรษที่ 2000; ทศวรรษที่ 2010; ทศวรรษที่ 2020; ร่วมสมัย (ไม่ระบุ); ก่อนปี 1940; วินเทจ (ไม่ระบุ); อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Epoca camionului model la scară: Anii 1940; Anii 1950; Anii 1960; Anii 1970; Anii 1980; Anii 1990; Anii 2000; Anii 2010; Anii 2020; Contemporan (nespecificat); Înainte de 1940; De epocă (nespecificat); Altele
ko: 축척 모델 트럭 시대: 1940년대; 1950년대; 1960년대; 1970년대; 1980년대; 1990년대; 2000년대; 2010년대; 2020년대; 현대(미지정); 1940년대 이전; 빈티지(미지정); 기타
es: Era de los camiones a escala: Década de 1940; Década de 1950; Década de 1960; Década de 1970; Década de 1980; Década de 1990; Década de 2000; Década de 2010; Década de 2020; Contemporánea (sin especificar); Anterior a 1940; Vintage (sin especificar); Otro
pt-PT: Época do camião do modelo em escala: Década de 1940; Década de 1950; Década de 1960; Década de 1970; Década de 1980; Década de 1990; Década de 2000; Década de 2010; Década de 2020; Contemporâneo (não especificado); Anterior a 1940; Clássico (não especificado); Outro
hu: Méretarányos makett teherautó-makett korszaka: 1940-es évek; 1950-es évek; 1960-as évek; 1970-es évek; 1980-as évek; 1990-es évek; 2000-es évek; 2010-es évek; 2020-as évek; Jelenkori (nincs megadva); 1940 előtti; Veterán (nincs megadva); Egyéb
da: Skalamodellastbils æra: 1940'erne; 1950'erne; 1960'erne; 1970'erne; 1980'erne; 1990'erne; 2000'erne; 2010'erne; 2020'erne; Moderne (uspecificeret); Før 1940; Vintage (uspecificeret); Andet
fr: Époque du camion miniature: Années 1940; Années 1950; Années 1960; Années 1970; Années 1980; Années 1990; Années 2000; Années 2010; Années 2020; Contemporain (non spécifié); Avant 1940; Vintage (non spécifié); Autre